Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the  2017-2019 biennium, notwithstanding section 10, chapter 705, Oregon
Laws 2013, are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Center for
Excellence in Engineering
and Technology/Cornett
Hall Renovation ............................ $ 2,050,000
(b) Oregon State University:
(A) Quality Foods and Beverage
Center .............................................$ 9,100,000
(B) Gilkey Hall Renovation .............. $ 2,050,000
(C) Cascades Academic
Building 2.............................. $ 10,215,000
(c) Portland State University,
Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 36,485,000
(d) University of Oregon,
Campus for Accelerating
[Scientific Impact .......................... $ 50,620,000]
Scientific Impact ................... $ 70,910,000
(e) Western Oregon University:
(A) Information Technology
Center Renovation ....................... $ 540,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 1
(B) Oregon Military Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 540,000
(f) Blue Mountain Community
College, Facility for
Agricultural Resource
Management .................................. $ 5,115,000
(g) Chemeketa Community
College, Agricultural
Complex ..........................................$ 6,125,000
(h) Clackamas Community College:
(A) DeJardin Building Addition ....... $ 8,140,000
(B) Student Services and
Community Commons .................. $ 8,140,000
(i) Clatsop Community College,
Marine Science Center
Renovation and Expansion ........ $ 8,135,000
(j) Columbia Gorge Community
College, Middle College
Prototype Facility ........................ $ 7,400,000
(k) Lane Community College,
Health Care Village Facility ..... $ 8,140,000
(L) Linn-Benton Community
College, Student Advising
and Campus Safety Center ........ $ 7,635,000
(m) Mt. Hood Community College,
Maywood Park Center ................ $ 8,140,000
(n) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ................. $ 8,140,000
(o) Portland Community College,
Health Technology
Building Renovation .................... $ 8,140,000
(p) Rogue Community College,
Elk Building Science Facility
Renovation and Expansion ........ $ 6,125,000
(q) Southwestern Oregon
Community College,
Dellwood Hall Remodel and
Expansion .......................................$ 2,805,000
(r) Treasure Valley Community
College, Workforce
Vocational Center ........................ $ 2,865,000
(s) Umpqua Community College,
Industrial Technology
Building ..........................................$ 8,140,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,300,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) .............. $ 101,180,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ............... $ 20,430,000
(5) Department of Education
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 2
(Art. XI-P) ......................................$ 100,985,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvements and
Renewal ..........................................$ 26,770,000
(B) Technology Infrastructure ......... $ 12,445,000
(b) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the Deaf
Facility Improvements ................ $ 4,365,000
(c) Department of Environmental
Quality, Environmental Data
Management System ............. $ 5,070,000
[(c)] (d) Department of Human
Services, ONE Integrated
Eligibility and Medicaid
Eligibility System ......................... $ 34,045,000
[(d)] (e) Department of Justice,
Child Support Enforcement
[Automated System ....................... $ 16,585,000]
Automated System ................ $ 19,400,000
[(e)] (f) Department of Revenue,
Core Tax Revenue Systems
Replacement .................................. $ 4,855,000
[(f)] (g) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(A) Lebanon Veteran’s Home
Parking Lot ................................... $ 1,345,000
(B) The Dalles Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements ................. $ 1,195,000
(C) Roseburg Veterans’ Home .......... $ 10,720,000
[(g)] (h) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
Housing Program ......................... $ 81,090,000
[(h)] (i) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ......... $ 50,620,000
(B) Eastern Oregon University,
Loso Hall Renovation ................ $ 5,575,000
(C) Oregon Institute of
Technology:
(i) Center for Excellence in
Engineering and Technology/
Cornett Hall Renovation ............ $ 38,475,000
(ii) Oregon Manufacturing
Innovation Center, Research
and Development Facility .......... $ 3,940,000
(D) Oregon State University:
(i) Cordley Hall Renovation ............ $ 15,250,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 3
(ii) Fairbanks Hall Renovation ........ $ 11,220,000
(iii) Gilkey Hall Renovation .............. $ 1,045,000
(iv) Cascades Expansion Site
Reclamation ................................... $ 9,145,000
(v) Cascades Academic
Building 2.............................. $ 29,410,000
(E) Portland State University,
Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 9,145,000
(F) Southern Oregon
University[ , Central Hall ]
[Capital Improvements ]:
(i) Central Hall Capital
Improvements ............................. $ 6,125,000
(ii) Boiler Replacement ............... $ 2,855,000
(G) Western Oregon University:
(i) Information Technology
Center Renovation ....................... $ 5,070,000
(ii) Oregon Military Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 7,335,000
[(i)] (j) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance,
[and Safety ................................... $ 13,960,000]
and Safety ............................. $ 23,660,000
[(j)] (k) Oregon Judicial Department:
(A) Lane County Courthouse ........... $ 5,115,000
(B) Multnomah County
Courthouse ..................................... $ 102,495,000
(C) Oregon Supreme Court
Building Renovation .................... $ 6,125,000
[(k)] (L) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Grants Pass Armory
Service Life Extension ................ $ 3,330,000
(B) Regional Armory Emergency
Enhancement Project .................. $ 8,675,000
(C) Regional Training Institute ....... $ 6,630,000
(D) Resiliency Grant Fund ................ $ 5,070,000
(E) Youth Challenge Armory ........... $ 5,095,000
[(L)] (m) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Capital Improvements ................. $ 17,450,000
(B) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovation ..................................... $ 15,450,000
(C) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ................................ $ 7,095,000
[(m)] (n) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife ................................... $ 10,215,000
[(n)] (o) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 774,225
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(7) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ........................ $ 120,000,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 4
(8) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University:
(A) Land Acquisition for
University Center Building ........ $ 15,260,000
(B) 12th & Market
Residence Hall .............................. $ 54,225,000
(C) Graduate School of
Education Facility ....................... $ 6,080,000
(D) Corbett Building Purchase ......... $ 5,100,000
(b) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Student
Recreation Center ...................... $ 5,115,000
(c) Eastern Oregon University,
Track and Field Facilities
[Restoration .................................... $ 790,000]
Restoration ........................... $ 1,180,000
(d) Western Oregon University,
Natural Sciences Building
Renovation............................ $ 3,560,000
(9) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,000,000
(10) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ................................... $ 25,000,000
(11) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Portland State Office
Building Improvements ............... $ 13,360,000
(b) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 1,075,775
Total General Obligation
[Bonds .............................................$ 1,257,310,000]
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,341,615,000
SECTION 2.  Section 2, chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The amounts  authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of revenue bonds
of the state during the 2017-2019 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
[Services Department .................... $ 300,000,000]
Services Department ............. $ 400,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department .................................... $ 30,000,000   
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
[Lottery Revenue Bonds .............. $ 199,860,000]
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 221,025,000
Total Direct Revenue
[Bonds .............................................$ 529,860,000]
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 5
Bonds .................................... $ 651,025,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds ..................... $ 400,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ..........................................$ 10,000,000
Oregon Facilities Authority ...... $ 1,350,000,000
Housing and Community
[Services Department .................... $ 325,000,000]
Services Department ............. $ 600,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
[Bonds .............................................$ 2,085,000,000]
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,360,000,000
[Total Revenue Bonds ............................ $ 2,614,860,000]
Total Revenue Bonds .................... $ 3,011,025,000
SECTION 3.  Section 3, chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  The amount authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance  of certificates of
participation and other financing agreements of the state during the  2017-2019 biennium for the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services is [ $110,985,000] $127,985,000.
SECTION 4.  Section 5, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Water Resources Department, the
State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an
amount that produces [ $20,700,000] $25,850,000 in net proceeds and interest earnings for the  pur-
poses described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an  additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to  the Water
Resources Department for deposit in the Water Supply Development Account  established in ORS
541.656, in an amount sufficient to provide:
(a) $15 million in net proceeds and interest earnings to provide grants  or loans to evaluate, plan
and develop in-stream and out-of-stream statewide water development projects.
(b) $2.5 million in net proceeds and interest earnings  to the City of Carlton to reduce
sedimentation and increase water storage capacity at the Panther Creek Reservoir.
(c) [ $2] $7.15 million in net proceeds and interest earnings to  the City of Carlton to replace the
city’s finished water supply line and reduce water loss.
(d) $1.2 million in net proceeds  and interest earnings to the Santiam Water Control District to
complete the Mill Creek Corporate Center irrigation conversion and efficiency project.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems en-
hances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth.
(b) Assisting local governments to mitigate losses resulting from reduced water supply  for irri-
gation and retirement of water rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and  promote
economic growth.
SECTION 5.  Section 21, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 21.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2013,  at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Department of Transportation
and the Oregon International Port of Coos Bay, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 6
bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds
and interest earnings for  the purpose described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds  issued under this section [ in an amount sufficient to provide
$10 million in  net proceeds and interest earnings ] must be transferred to the Department of Trans-
portation for deposit in the DOT Economic  Development Distributions Fund established in section
24 [of this 2013 Act ], chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, in an amount sufficient to provide:
(a) $7 million in net proceeds and interest earnings  for distribution to the  Oregon Interna-
tional Port of  Coos Bay for the purpose of acquiring, constructing or improving the Coos Bay rail
link, as defined in ORS 777.915.
(b) $3 million in net proceeds and interest earnings for distribution to the  Oregon Inter-
national Port of Coos Bay for acquisition of the Coos Bay rail link rolling stock.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based  on the finding that improvements in  and con-
tinued operation of multimodal transportation systems are necessary to facilitate the flow of  goods
and services to national and international markets through the deep-water port at Coos Bay.
SECTION 6. (1) For the  biennium ending June 30, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with De Paul Treat-
ment Centers, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2 million in net proceeds and  interest
earnings for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under  this section in an amount sufficient to
provide $2 million in net  proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in the ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established  under
ORS 461.553 for distribution to De Paul Treatment Centers for a new treatment center fa-
cility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
individuals increase their potential  for self-sufficiency, increase economic productivity and
use fewer  public resources when they have access to addiction treatment programs and
services.
SECTION 7. (1) For the  biennium ending June 30, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with Trillium Family
Services, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3  million in net proceeds and interest earnings for
the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under  this section in an amount sufficient to
provide $3 million in net proceeds and interest earnings must be  transferred to the depart-
ment for  deposit in the ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under
ORS 461.553 for distribution to Trillium Family Services for construction of a secure adoles-
cent inpatient facility at the Children’s Farm Home Corvallis campus.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
expanding the Children’s Farm Home will create jobs in construction and health care.
SECTION 8.
(1) For the  biennium ending June 30, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Higher Ed-
ucation Coordinating Commission,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 7
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $9 million in net proceeds
and interest earnings for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an
additional amount estimated by  the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related
costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under  this section in an amount sufficient to
provide $9 million in  net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission for deposit in  the Public University Fund established
under ORS 352.450, segregated  in a distinct subaccount to allow necessary compliance with
the Internal Revenue Code, for distribution to Eastern Oregon University  to construct a new
field house facility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) A new facility is needed in order for  the university to have adequate instructional and
athletic space.
(b) Having adequate university buildings and facilities is essential to Oregon’s  healthy
economic growth.
(c) The field house facility will be used  as a venue for regional events, providing signif-
icant economic benefits to local communities.
(d) Oregon manufactured wood  products, including cross-laminated timber, will be uti-
lized in the construction of the field house  facility, supporting Oregon’s wood products
manufacturing industry.
SECTION 9. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 8